sl-SI: Vir energije: Napajanje z izmeničnim tokom; Alkohol; Baterije; Baterije; Butan; Oglje; Vžigalnik za cigare; Napajanje z enosmernim tokom; Dizel; Etanol; Drva za kurjavo; Bencin; Vroča voda; Hibridni; Hidravlika; Infrardeča; Ročno; Mehansko; Zemeljski plin; Olje; Peleti; Pnevmatski; Propan; Polnilna; Sonce; USB; Električni sistem vozila; Drugo
pl: Źródło zasilania: Zasilany prądem przemiennym; Alkohol; Akumulatory; Zasilanie akumulatorowe; Butan; Węgiel drzewny; Zapalniczka; Zasilane prądem stałym; ON; Etanol; Drewno opałowe; Benzyna; Gorąca woda; Hybrydowy; Hydrauliczne; Podczerwień; Ręczny; Mechaniczne; Gaz ziemny; Ropa naftowa; Granulat; Pneumatyczne; Propan; Ładowalna; Słoneczna; USB; Instalacja elektryczna pojazdu; Pozostałe
pt-BR: Fonte de energia: Alimentado por AC; Álcool; Baterias; Alimentado por bateria; Butano; Carvão; Isqueiro; Alimentado por DC; Diesel; Etanol; Lenha; Gasolina; Água quente; Híbrida; Hidráulico; Infravermelho; Manual; Mecânica; Gás natural; Óleo; Pelota; Pneumático; Propano; Recarregável; Solar; USB; Sistema elétrico do veículo; Outro
de: Energiequelle: Wechselstrombetrieben; Alkohol; Batterien; Batteriebetrieben; Butan; Holzkohle; Zigarettenanzünder; Gleichstrombetrieben; Diesel; Ethanol; Feuerholz; Benzin; Heißwasser; Hybrid; Hydraulisch; Infrarot; Manuell; Mechanisch; Erdgas; Öl; Pellet; Pneumatisch; Propan; Wiederaufladbar; Solar; USB; Elektrisches System des Fahrzeugs; Sonstiges
th: แหล่งพลังงาน: แบบใช้ไฟ AC; แอลกอฮอล์; แบตเตอรี่; ใช้พลังงานจากแบตเตอรี่; บิวเทน; ถ่านไม้; ไฟแช็กซิการ์; แบบใช้ไฟ DC; ดีเซล; เอทานอล; ฟืน; น้ำมันเบนซิน; น้ำร้อน; แบบไฮบริด; ไฮดรอลิก; อินฟราเรด; มือเข็น; แบบกลไก; แก๊สธรรมชาติ; น้ำมัน; เชื้อเพลิงอัดเม็ด; นิวเมติก; โพรเพน; ชาร์จใหม่ได้; แสงอาทิตย์; USB; ระบบไฟฟ้าของยานพาหนะ; อื่นๆ
cs: Zdroj napájení: Napájení střídavým proudem; Alkohol; Baterie; Napájení z baterií; Butan; Dřevěné uhlí; Zapalovač cigaret; Napájení stejnosměrným proudem; Motorová nafta; Ethanol; Palivové dřevo; Benzín; Horká voda; Hybridní; Hydraulický; Infračervená; Ruční; Mechanický; Zemní plyn; Olej; Peleta; Pneumatický; Propan; Dobíjecí; Solární; USB; Elektrický systém vozidel; Jiné
vi: Nguồn năng lượng: Nguồn AC; Cồn; Pin; Chạy bằng ắc quy; Butane; Than củi; Bật lửa xì gà; Nguồn DC; Diesel; Ethanol; Củi; Xăng; Nước nóng; Ván kết hợp; Thủy lực; Hồng ngoại; Xe lăn thủ công; Cơ; Khí tự nhiên; Dầu; Viên nhiên liệu; Khí nén; Propane; Sạc được; Năng lượng mặt trời; USB; Hệ thống điện trên xe; Khác
ko: 전원: AC 전원; 알코올; 배터리; 배터리 구동; 뷰테인; 숯; 시가 라이터; DC 전원; 디젤; 에탄올; 장작; 가솔린; 온수; 하이브리드; 유압; 적외선; 수동; 기계식; 천연가스; 오일; 펠릿; 공압식; 프로페인; 충전식; 태양광; USB; 차량 전기 시스템; 기타
lt-LT: Maitinimo šaltinis: Maitinamas kintamąja srove; Alkoholis; Akumuliatoriai; Maitinamas akumuliatoriumi; Butanas; Medžio anglis; Cigarų žiebtuvėlis; Maitinamas nuolatine srove; Dyzelinas; Etanolis; Malkos; Benzinas; Karštas vanduo; Hibridinė; Hidraulinis; Infraraudonieji spinduliai; Rankinis; Mechaninis; Gamtinės dujos; Aliejus; Granulės; Pneumatinis; Propanas; Įkraunama; Saulė; USB; Automobilio elektros sistema; Kita
pt-PT: Fonte de energia: Alimentado por CA; Álcool; Baterias; Alimentado por bateria; Butano; Carvão; Isqueiro; Alimentado por CC; Gasóleo; Etanol; Lenha; Gasolina; Água quente; Híbrido; Hidráulico; Infravermelho; Manual; Mecânico; Gás natural; Óleo; Péletes; Pneumático; Propano; Recarregável; Solar; USB; Sistema elétrico de veículo; Outro
da: Strømkilde: AC-drevet; Alkohol; Batterier; Batteridrevet; Butan; Trækul; Cigarlighter; DC-drevet; Diesel; Ethanol; Brænde; Benzin; Varmt vand; Hybrid; Hydraulisk; Infrarød; Manuel; Mekanisk; Naturgas; Olie; Piller; Pneumatisk; Propan; Genopladelig; Solceller; USB; Køretøjets elektriske system; Andet
sv: Strömkälla: AC-driven; Alkohol; Batterier; Batteridriven; Butan; Träkol; Tändare; DC-driven; Diesel; Etanol; Brasved; Bensin; Varmt vatten; Hybrid; Hydraulisk; Infraröd; Manuell; Mekaniskt; Naturgas; Olja; Pellet; Pneumatisk; Propan; Uppladdningsbar; Sol; USB; Fordonets elsystem; Annat
zh-CN: 电源: AC 电源; 酒精; 蓄电池; 电池供电; 丁烷; 炭; 点烟器; DC 电源; 柴油; 乙醇; 木柴; 汽油; 热水; 混合型; 液压; 红外; 手动; 机械; 天然气; 润滑油; 粒料; 气动; 丙烷; 可充电; 太阳; USB; 车辆电气系统; 其他
fr: Source d’énergie: Alimenté par courant alternatif; Alcool; Piles; Alimenté par batterie; Butane; Charbon; Allume-cigare; Alimenté par courant continu; Diesel; Ethanol; Bois de chauffage; Gasoline; Eau chaude; Hybrid; Hydraulique; Infrarouge; Manuel; Mécanique; Gaz naturel; Huile; Granulé; Pneumatique; Propane; Rechargeable; Solaire; USB; Système électrique du véhicule; Autre
es: Fuente de alimentación: Alimentado por CA; Alcohol; Baterías; Funciona con baterías; Butano; Carbón; Encendedor; Alimentado por CC; Diésel; Etanol; Leña; Gasolina; Agua caliente; Híbrido; Hidráulico; Infrarrojo; Manual; Mecánico; Gas natural; Aceite; Bolita; Neumático; Propano; Recargable; Solar; USB; Sistema eléctrico del vehículo; Otros
nl: Voedingsbron: AC-voeding; Alcohol; Batterijen; Werkt op batterijen; Butaan; Houtskool; Sigarenaansteker; DC-voeding; Diesel; Ethanol; Brandhout; Benzine; Heet water; Hybride; Hydraulisch; Infrarood; Handmatig; Mechanisch; Aardgas; Olie; Pellet; Pneumatisch; Propaan; Oplaadbaar; Zon; USB; Elektrisch systeem voertuig; Andere
el: Πηγή ενέργειας: Εναλλασσόμενου ρεύματος; Αλκοόλ; Μπαταρίες; Τροφοδοτούμενο από μπαταρίες; Βουτάνιο; Ξυλάνθρακας; Αναπτήρας πούρων; Τροφοδοσία DC; Ντίζελ; Αιθανόλη; Καυσόξυλα; Βενζίνη; Ζεστό νερό; Υβριδικό; Υδραυλικό; Υπέρυθρες; Χειροκίνητο; Μηχανικό; Φυσικό αέριο; Έλαιο; Σφαιρίδιο; Πεπιεσμένου αέρα; Προπάνιο; Επαναφορτιζόμενη; Ηλιακό; USB; Ηλεκτρικό σύστημα οχήματος; Άλλο
it: Fonte di alimentazione: Alimentato in CA; Alcol; Batterie; Alimentato a batteria; Butano; Carbone; Accendisigari; Alimentato in CC; Diesel; Etanolo; Legna da ardere; Benzina; Acqua calda; Ibrido; Idraulico; Infrarossi; Manuale; Meccanico; Gas naturale; Olio; Pellet; Pneumatico; Propano; Ricaricabile; Solare; USB; Impianto elettrico del veicolo; Altro
fi: Tehonlähde: AC-virtalähde; Alkoholi; Akut; Akkukäyttöinen; Butaani; Puuhiili; Tupakansytytin; DC-virtalähde; Diesel; Etanoli; Polttopuut; Bensiini; Kuuma vesi; Hybridi; Hydraulinen; Infrapuna; Manuaalinen; Mekaaninen; Luonnonkaasu; Öljyt; Pelletit; Pneumaattinen; Propaani; Ladattava; Aurinko; USB; Ajoneuvon sähköjärjestelmä; Muu
sk-SK: Zdroj energie: Napájaný striedavým prúdom; Alkohol; Batérie; Napájaný batériou; Bután; Drevené uhlie; Zapaľovač cigár; Napájaný jednosmerným prúdom; Naftový; Etanol; Palivové drevo; Benzínový; Horúca voda; Hybridný; Hydraulický; Infračervený; Manuálny; Mechanický; Zemný plyn; Olej; Pelety; Pneumatický; Propán; Nabíjateľný; Solárny; USB; Elektrický systém vozidla; Iné
ja: 電源: AC電源; アルコール; バッテリー; バッテリー駆動; ブタン; 木炭; ライター; DC電源; ディーゼル; エタノール; 薪; ガソリン; 熱湯; ハイブリッド; 油圧; 赤外線; 手動; メカニカル; 天然ガス; オイル; ペレット; ニューマチック; プロパン; 充電式; ソーラー; USB; 車両電気系統; その他
zh-TW: 電源: 交流電功率; 乙醇; 電池; 電池供電; 丁烷; 活性碳; 打火機; 直流電功率; 柴油; 乙醇; 木柴; 汽油; 即熱式熱水器; 混合; 水力; 紅外線; 手動; 機械; 天然氣; 油; 顆粒燃料; 氣動的; 丙烷; 可充電的; 太陽能; USB; 車輛電力系統; 其他
ru: Источник питания: Питание от переменного тока; Спирт; Аккумуляторы; Питание от батареи; Бутан; Древесный уголь; Прикуриватель; Питание от постоянного тока; Дизель; Этанол; Дрова; Бензин; Горячая вода; Гибридные; Гидравлический; Инфракрасный; Ручной; Механический; Природный газ; Масло; Пеллеты; Пневматический; Пропан; Перезаряжаемый; Солнечный; USB; Электрическая система автомобиля; Другое
hr-HR: Izvor energije: Na izmjeničnu struju; Alkohol; Baterije; Na baterije; Butan; Ugljen; Upaljač za cigare; Na istosmjernu struju; Dizel; Etanol; Drva za ogrjev; Benzin; Topla voda; Hibridni; Hidraulika; Infracrveno; Ručno; Mehanički; Prirodni plin; Ulje; Pelet; Pneumatski; Propan; Punjivo; Solarno; USB; Električni sustav vozila; Ostalo
hu: Áramforrás: Váltóáramú; Alkohol; Elemek; Elemmel működő; Bután; Faszén; Szivargyújtó; Egyenáramú; Dízel; Etanol; Tűzifa; Benzin; Meleg víz; Hibrid; Hidraulikus; Infravörös; Manuális; Mechanikus; Földgáz; Olaj; Pellet; Pneumatikus; Propán; Újratölthető; Napenergia; USB; Jármű elektromos rendszere; Egyéb
nb: Strømkilde: AC-drevet; Alkohol; Batterier; Batteridrevet; Butan; Kull; Sigarettenner; DC-drevet; Diesel; Etanol; Ved; Bensin; Varmtvann; Hybrid; Hydraulisk; Infrarød; Manuell; Mekanisk; Naturgass; Olje; Pellet; Pneumatisk; Propan; Oppladbar; Solar; USB; Kjøretøyets elektriske system; Annen
tr: Güç Kaynağı: AC destekli; Alkol; Bataryalar; Pille çalışan; Bütan; Kömür; Çakmak; DC destekli; Dizel; Etanol; Yakacak Odun; Benzin; Sıcak su; Hibrit; Hidrolik; Kızılötesi; Manuel; Mekanik; Doğal gaz; Yağ; Pelet; Pnömatik; Propan; Şarj edilebilir; Güneş; USB; Araç elektrik sistemi; Diğer
ro-RO: Sursă de alimentare: Alimentat cu curent alternativ; Alcool; Baterii; Alimentat cu baterie; Butan; Cărbune; Brichetă; Alimentat cu curent continuu; Motorină; Etanol; Lemne de foc; Gazolină; Apă fierbinte; Hibrid; Hidraulică; Infraroșu; Manuală; Mecanică; Gaz natural; Petrol; Pelete; Pneumatică; Propan; Reîncărcabilă; Solară; USB; Sistemul electric al vehiculului; Altele
en: Power source: AC-powered; Alcohol; Batteries; Battery-powered; Butane; Charcoal; Cigar lighter; DC-powered; Diesel; Ethanol; Firewood; Gasoline; Hot water; Hybrid; Hydraulic; Infrared; Manual; Mechanical; Natural gas; Oil; Pellet; Pneumatic; Propane; Rechargeable; Solar; USB; Vehicle electrical system; Other
bg-BG: Източник на захранване: Захранване с променлив ток; Алкохол; Батерии; Захранване с батерии; Бутан; Въглен; Запалка за пури; Захранване с постоянен ток; Дизел; Етанол; Дърва за огрев; Бензин; Гореща вода; Хибрид; Хидравличен; Инфрачервен; Ръчен; Механичен; Природен газ; Масло; Пелети; Пневматичен; Пропан; Акумулаторен; Соларен; USB; Електрическа система на превозното средство; Други